Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Housing Assistance.

Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

are derived in part from former AS 44.47.370 — 44.47.560.
Under §§ 1-14, ch. 36, SLA 1992, effective May 27, 1992, and retroactive to January 1, 1992, references to “rural” in former AS 44.47.370 — 44.47.560 were changed to “small community”, AS 44.47.410(a) was repealed, and some of the definitions in AS 44.47.560 were amended.
The same changes were made in §§ 120-132 and § 139, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, effective June 26, 1992, and retroactive to January 1, 1992.
AS 44.47.370 — 44.47.560 were then repealed under § 140, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, effective July 1, 1992.
For the law in effect from January 1, 1992 through June 30, 1992, see ch. 36, SLA 1992, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For AHFC rural housing, see 15 AAC 152.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 134, SLA 2004 (SB 274), proposing amendments to various housing assistance programs described in this article, see 2004 Senate Journal 1985 - 1986.

Sec. 18.56.400.
Powers of corporation related to housing assistance.

The board may

adopt regulations in accordance with AS

18.56.088

to implement AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

;

make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions granted under AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

;

purchase or participate in the purchase of small community housing mortgage loans under AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

;

purchase or participate in the purchase of loans for building materials for small community housing under AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

;

procure insurance against loss in connection with the corporation’s functions under AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

;

acquire real or personal property, or an interest in real or personal property, by purchase, transfer, or foreclosure, when the acquisition is necessary or appropriate to protect a loan in which the corporation has an interest; sell, transfer and convey that property to a buyer; and, if the sale, transfer or conveyance cannot be effected with reasonable promptness or at a reasonable price, rent or lease the property to a tenant pending the sale, transfer or conveyance;

do all acts necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the powers expressly granted or necessarily implied in AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

;

originate and service direct loans made to qualified buyers under AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For housing assistance loan fund, see 15 AAC 152, art. 1.

For home ownership assistance program, see 15 AAC 152, art. 2.

For federally guaranteed and insured rural housing loan programs, see 15 AAC 152, art. 3.

Sec. 18.56.410.
Alaska energy efficient home grant fund.

There is established in the corporation the Alaska energy efficient home grant fund consisting of money appropriated to it by the legislature and deposited in it by the corporation. The corporation shall administer the Alaska energy efficient home grant fund under the provisions of this section.

Subject to appropriation, the corporation may grant funds from the Alaska energy efficient home grant fund to agencies of the state or federal government, individuals, or businesses that retrofit existing single family dwellings or build new single family dwellings that meet criteria adopted by the corporation.

The corporation shall adopt guidelines and procedures for the fund.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 2 ch 73 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For home energy loan subsidy grant, see 15 AAC 155, art. 2.

For home energy rating rebate grant, see 15 AAC 155, art. 3.

For definitions, see 15 AAC 155, art. 9.

Sec. 18.56.420.
Housing assistance loan program.

There is created in the corporation the housing assistance loan program. The corporation shall provide money to originate, purchase, participate in the purchase of, or refinance

small community housing mortgage loans;

loans made for building materials for small community housing;

loans made for renovations or improvements to small community housing; and

loans made for the construction of owner-occupied small community housing other than loans to builders or contractors or loans that compensate an owner for the owner’s labor or services in constructing the owner’s own housing.

[Repealed, § 8 ch 134 SLA 2004.]

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 1 ch 129 SLA 2002; am §§ 1, 8 ch 134 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For housing assistance loan fund, see 15 AAC 152, art. 1.

Sec. 18.56.430.
Home ownership assistance fund.

There is created in the corporation the home ownership assistance fund consisting of money appropriated to it by the legislature and deposited in it by the corporation. Money in the fund shall be used solely to assist persons of lower and moderate income to purchase or construct single-family homes financed under AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

by providing a subsidy to those persons.

The subsidy provided by this section may not exceed the amount that is necessary to reduce the annual interest rate paid on the mortgage loan to six percent.

A mortgage loan that is subsidized from the home ownership assistance fund may not exceed $120,000.

The corporation shall adopt regulations that establish maximum income-to-loan payment ratios for persons who apply for a subsidy under this section.

In this section, “persons of lower and moderate income” means individuals considered by the corporation to require assistance under this section because of inadequate income or other limited personal financial resources, taking into consideration

the amount of total income available for housing needs;

the size of the family;

the cost and condition of available housing;

standards established in various federal programs for determining eligibility based on income;

the ability to enter the private housing market and to pay market amounts for decent, safe, and sanitary housing; and

other factors considered relevant by the corporation.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For home ownership assistance program, see 15 AAC 152, art. 2.

Sec. 18.56.440.
Limitations on use of housing assistance loan program.

The housing assistance loan program may not be used to

originate a direct loan or purchase or participate in the purchase of a small community housing mortgage loan that exceeds the limitations on mortgage loans purchased by the Federal National Mortgage Association as to principal amount or loan-to-value ratio;

originate a direct loan or purchase or participate in the purchase of a loan made for building materials for small community housing

that exceeds $45,000 or exceeds

80 percent of the appraised value of the work completed on the small community housing for which the loan is made if the small community housing is pledged as collateral for the loan; or

90 percent of the value of other property that is pledged as security for the loan and that is satisfactory to the corporation as collateral;

unless the terms of the loan agreement require inspections and certifications, as required by regulations of the corporation, at the expense of the borrower; and

unless the period of time allowed for repayment of the loan is equal to or less than 15 years;

originate direct loans or purchase or participate in the purchase of a small community housing mortgage loan that is secured by real property the marketable title to which is shown under AS

18.56.480(b)(2)

if the total amount of outstanding small community housing mortgage loans held by the corporation exceeds 10 times the amount of money in the restricted title loss reserve account established by AS

18.56.490

;

originate a direct loan for small community housing or purchase or participate in the purchase of a small community housing mortgage loan, other than a loan for the repair, remodeling, rehabilitation, or expansion of an existing owner-occupied residence, if the borrower has an outstanding housing loan made under a state loan program, other than a loan for nonowner-occupied housing under AS

18.56.580

or under former AS 44.47.520, that bears interest at a rate that was less than the prevailing market interest rate for similar housing loans at the time the loan was made;

originate a direct mortgage loan or purchase or participate in the purchase of a mortgage loan for rental housing unless the borrower agrees not to discriminate against tenants or prospective tenants because of sex, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, race, religion, color, national origin, or status as a student; or

originate, purchase, or participate in a loan to a person who has a past due child support obligation established by court order or by the child support services agency under AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.220

at the time of application.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 2 ch 134 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement division” was changed to “child support services agency” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004, and to correct a manifest error.

Administrative Code. —

For housing assistance loan fund, see 15 AAC 152, art. 1.

Sec. 18.56.450.
Operating loss reserve account.

There is established an operating loss reserve account for the purpose of meeting legal expenses incurred through the foreclosure of properties acquired by the corporation under AS

18.56.400

(6) and making repairs to these properties so that they may be sold to new buyers.

The operating reserve loss account consists of money appropriated to it by the legislature and deposited in it by the corporation. To the extent that money is paid out of the operating loss reserve account for the purposes stated in this section, this money shall be replaced with money received as interest on loans authorized by AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.56.460.
Security for loans.

The corporation shall adopt regulations in accordance with AS

18.56.088

establishing acceptable security for loans originated or purchased in whole or in part under AS

18.56.420

.

A person may pledge as security for the repayment of a loan originated or purchased in whole or in part under AS

18.56.420

a preference right that person holds to receive title to land the person occupies as a primary place of residence, primary place of business, subsistence campsite, or as headquarters for reindeer husbandry. The preference right must be conveyed to the person by the Native corporation to which the land was granted under 43 U.S.C. 1613 (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) before it may be pledged as security under this subsection. The corporation shall prescribe procedures and standard forms for establishing, pledging, and appraising the value of a preference right held by a person to secure the repayment of a loan originated or purchased in whole or in part under AS

18.56.420

.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.56.470.
Interest on loans.

The interest rate on a mortgage loan originated or purchased in whole or in part under AS

18.56.420

for small community housing or multi-family housing under AS

18.56.580

is one percent less than the interest rate, as determined under AS

18.56.098(f)(1)

— (4), on a mortgage loan purchased under AS

18.56.098(a)

from the proceeds of the most recent applicable issue of taxable bonds before the origination or purchase of the mortgage loan originated or purchased under AS

18.56.420

. However, the interest rate on that portion of a loan that exceeds $250,000 is the same as the interest rate determined under AS

18.56.098(f)(1)

— (4).

Notwithstanding the requirements of (a) of this section, if there has not been an applicable issue of taxable bonds issued within six months before the origination or purchase of a loan under this section, the corporation may estimate the interest rate that an issue of taxable bonds would bear.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 2 ch 129 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 134 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, in subsection (a), “AS

18.56.098(f)(1)

-(4)” was substituted for “AS

18.56.098(f)(1)

-(14)” to correct a manifest error in ch. 129, SLA 2002.

Administrative Code. —

For housing assistance loan fund, see 15 AAC 152, art. 1.

Sec. 18.56.480.
Title.

Before the corporation originates or purchases a small community housing mortgage loan in whole or in part, the corporation may require a borrower to show marketable title to real property offered as security for the loan to be purchased.

A borrower may show marketable title to real property for the purposes of (a) of this section

by purchasing title insurance from a title insurance company authorized to do business in the state; or

by delivering to the corporation a copy of a letter of intent signed by an authorized representative of the United States Department of the Interior that shows the transfer of title to the property from the United States government to the borrower if

the borrower is an Alaska Native; and

title to the property was originally transferred from the United States government, directly or indirectly, to the borrower under federal law.

For the purposes of this section, a deed which federal law prohibits or limits the power to transfer or encumber and which would otherwise constitute marketable title to real property is considered marketable title to real property if the United States Bureau of Indian Affairs or another appropriate federal agency waives immunity under the federal law from foreclosure or other alienation of the real property.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.56.490.
Restricted title loss reserve account.

There is established in the corporation the restricted title loss reserve account. The restricted title loss reserve account consists of money appropriated to it by the legislature and deposited to it by the corporation, and shall be administered by the corporation.

The corporation may withdraw money from the restricted title loss reserve account in an amount equal to the loss to the corporation on a small community housing mortgage loan originated or purchased in whole or in part by the corporation if marketable title to the real property used to secure the loan was shown under AS

18.56.480(b)(2)

. Money withdrawn from the restricted title loss reserve account under this section shall be deposited in the Alaska housing finance revolving fund (AS

18.56.082

).

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 4 ch 134 SLA 2004)

Sec. 18.56.500.
Fire insurance.

Before purchasing or participating in the purchase of a small community housing mortgage loan, the corporation may require the borrower to agree to purchase and maintain fire insurance for the real property for which the loan is made in an amount not less than the outstanding principal balance of the loan.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For housing assistance loan fund, see 15 AAC 152, art. 1.

Sec. 18.56.510.
Loan origination and servicing.

Before purchasing or participating in the purchase of a small community housing mortgage loan, the corporation shall enter into a loan servicing agreement with the private financial institution from which the loan is to be purchased.

The corporation may execute service agreements with private lending institutions or with regional Native housing authorities established under AS

18.55.996

to service loans originated by the corporation or loans originated under AS

18.55.997

.

Under the servicing agreement, the private financial institution or the regional Native housing authority shall administer the loan and may charge the corporation a negotiated origination or servicing fee on the corporation’s share of the loan. When appropriate, the private financial institution or the regional Native housing authority may also charge the borrower a reasonable originator fee not to exceed one percent.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For housing assistance loan fund, see 15 AAC 152, art. 1.

Sec. 18.56.520.
Appraisals.

Before originating or purchasing or participating in the purchase of a small community housing mortgage loan, the corporation may have or may require the borrower to have an appraisal made of the fair market value of the real property, including structures on the real property, for which the loan is made. In conducting an appraisal under this section, the appraiser shall give full value to insulation and other features of construction in structures on the real property that add to the energy efficiency of the structures.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.56.530.
Energy audit exemption.

In making loans under AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

, the corporation is exempt from the requirements of AS

46.11.050(b)

.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.56.540.
Toll-free telephone number.

For the purposes of administration of AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

, the corporation shall arrange for and maintain a toll-free telephone number for the corporation so that private financial institutions and their borrowers may contact the corporation from any location in the state by telephone without a toll charge.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.56.550.
Field offices; contract services; assistance to others.

The corporation may establish field offices under AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

, may hire one or more lending officers, and may contract for the services of

real property appraisers who are familiar with housing and construction in small communities; and

engineers who are familiar with engineering problems in arctic and subarctic regions.

The personnel described in (a) of this section may make visits to small communities to provide preconstruction and post-construction inspections of real property for which loans are originated or purchased by the corporation in whole or in part under AS

18.56.420

and to provide assistance to private financial institutions and their borrowers. Authority for final approval of loans may not be exercised by the personnel described in this section.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 5 ch 134 SLA 2004)

Sec. 18.56.560.
Demonstration projects and information.

The corporation may enter into agreements with public and private agencies to provide demonstration projects and information concerning housing construction in small communities.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 6 ch 134 SLA 2004)

Sec. 18.56.570.
Regional allocation. [Repealed, § 8 ch 134 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 18.56.580.
Loans for multi-family housing.

The corporation may use the housing assistance loan program created in AS

18.56.420

to make loans for the purchase, participation in the purchase, origination, development, or refinancing of multi-family housing in small communities.

In this section,

“development” means the construction of a new residence or the acquisition, repair, remodeling, rehabilitation, or expansion of an existing residence;

“multi-family housing” means a multi-family residence containing two or more dwelling units that may be nonowner-occupied or owner-occupied.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 3 ch 129 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 126 SLA 2003; am § 7 ch 134 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For definitions, see 15 AAC 150, art. 6.

For housing assistance loan fund, see 15 AAC 152, art. 1.

Sec. 18.56.590.
Annual report. [Repealed, § 42 ch 12 SLA 2006.]

Sec. 18.56.600.
Definitions.

In AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

,

“housing” means owner-occupied, single-family housing and owner-occupied duplexes in which not more than 25 percent of the gross floor area is or will be devoted to commercial use;

“small community” means a community with a population of 6,500 or less that is not connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks, or with a population of 1,600 or less that is connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks; in this paragraph, “connected by road” does not include a connection by the Alaska marine highway system.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 1 ch 97 SLA 1998)